California statutes. Family Code
(2) The tribunal of the issuing state made specific findings in favor of the respondent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 134, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6403.

(a) A law enforcement officer of this state, upon determining that there is probable cause to believe that a valid foreign protection order exists and that the order has been violated, shall enforce the order as if it were the order of a tribunal of this state. Presentation of a protection order that identifies both the protected individual and the respondent and, on its face, is currently in effect constitutes, in and of itself, probable cause to believe that a valid foreign protection order exists. For the purposes of this section, the protection order may be inscribed on a tangible medium or may have been stored in an electronic or other medium if it is retrievable in perceivable form. Presentation of a certified copy of a protection order is not required for enforcement.

(b) If a foreign protection order is not presented, a law enforcement officer of this state may consider other information in determining whether there is probable cause
 to believe that a valid foreign protection order exists.

(c) If a law enforcement officer of this state determines that an otherwise valid foreign protection order cannot be enforced because the respondent has not been notified or served with the order, the officer shall inform the respondent of the order, make a reasonable effort to serve the order upon the respondent, and allow the respondent a reasonable opportunity to comply with the order before enforcing the order. Verbal notice of the terms of the order is sufficient notice for the purposes of this section.

(d) Registration or filing of an order in this state is not required for the enforcement of a valid foreign protection order pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 816, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

6404.

(a) A foreign protection order shall, upon request of the person in possession of the order, be registered with a court of this state in order to be entered in the California Restraining and Protective Order System established under Section 6380. The Judicial Council shall adopt rules of court to do the following:

(1) Set forth the process whereby a person in possession of a foreign protection order may voluntarily register the order with a court of this state for entry into the California Restraining and Protective Order System.

(2) Require the sealing of foreign protection orders and provide access
 only to law enforcement, the person who registered the order upon written request with proof of identification, the defense after arraignment on criminal charges involving an alleged violation of the order, or upon further order of the court.

(b) A fee shall not be charged for the registration of a foreign protection order. The court clerk shall provide all Judicial Council forms required by this part to a person in possession of a foreign protection order free of charge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 72.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6405.

(a) There shall be no civil liability on the part of, and no cause of action for false arrest or false imprisonment against, a peace officer who makes an arrest pursuant to a foreign protection order that is regular upon its face, if the peace officer, in making the arrest, acts in good faith and has reasonable cause to believe that the person against whom the order is issued has notice of the order and has committed an act in violation of the order.

 (b) If there is more than one order issued and one of the orders is an emergency protective order that has precedence in enforcement pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 136.2 of the Penal Code, the peace officer shall enforce the emergency protective order. If there is more than one order issued, none of the orders issued is an emergency protective order that has precedence in enforcement, and one of the orders issued is a no-contact order, as described in Section 6320, the peace officer shall
 enforce the no-contact order. If there is more than one civil order regarding the same parties and neither an emergency protective order that has precedence in enforcement nor a no-contact order has been issued, the peace officer shall enforce the order that was issued last. If there are both civil and criminal orders regarding the same parties and
 neither an emergency protective order that has precedence in enforcement nor a no-contact order has been issued, the peace officer shall enforce the criminal order issued last.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to exonerate a peace officer from liability for the unreasonable use of force in the enforcement of the order. The immunities afforded by this section shall not affect the
 availability of any other immunity that may apply, including, but not limited to, Sections 820.2 and 820.4 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 263, Sec. 3.   (AB 176)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 263.)
-------------------------------------------

6406.

A protected individual who pursues remedies under this part is not precluded from pursuing other legal or equitable remedies against the respondent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 816, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

6407.

In applying and construing this part, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that also have adopted the act cited in Section 6400.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 816, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

6408.

If any provision of this part or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this part which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this part are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 816, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

6409.

This part applies to protection orders issued before January 1, 2002, and to continuing actions for enforcement of foreign protection orders commenced before January 1, 2002. A request for enforcement of a foreign protection order made on or after January 1, 2002, for violations of a foreign protection order occurring before January 1, 2002, is governed by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 816, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. Uniform Recognition and Enforcement of Canadian Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act [6450. - 6460.]

6450.

This part may be cited as the Uniform Recognition and Enforcement of Canadian Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 98, Sec. 1.   (SB 204)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6451.

In this part:

(a) “Canadian domestic violence protection order” means a judgment or part of a judgment or order issued in English in a civil proceeding by a court of Canada under law of the issuing jurisdiction that relates to domestic violence and prohibits a respondent from doing any of the following:

(1) Being in physical proximity to a protected individual or following a protected individual.

(2) Directly or indirectly contacting or communicating with a protected
 individual or other individual described in the order.

(3) Being within a certain distance of a specified place or
 location associated with a protected individual.

(4) Molesting, annoying, harassing, or engaging in threatening conduct directed at a protected individual.

(b) “Domestic protection order” means an injunction or other order issued by a tribunal that relates to domestic or family violence laws to prevent an individual from engaging in violent or threatening acts against, harassment of, direct or indirect contact or communication with, or being in physical proximity to, another individual.

(c) “Issuing court” means the court that issues a Canadian domestic violence protection order.

(d) “Law enforcement officer” means an individual authorized by
 law of this state to enforce a domestic protection order.

(e) “Person” means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other legal entity.

(f) “Protected individual” means an individual protected by a Canadian domestic violence protection order.

(g) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(h) “Respondent” means an individual against whom a Canadian domestic violence protection order is issued.

(i) “State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes a federally recognized Indian tribe.

(j) “Tribunal” means a court, agency, or other entity authorized by law to establish, enforce, or modify a domestic protection order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 98, Sec. 1.   (SB 204)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6452.

(a) If a law enforcement officer determines under subdivision (b) or (c) that there is probable cause to believe a valid Canadian domestic violence protection order exists and the order has been violated, the officer shall enforce the terms of the Canadian domestic violence protection order as if the terms were in an order of a tribunal of this state. Presentation to a law enforcement officer of a certified copy of a Canadian domestic violence protection order is not required for enforcement.

(b) Presentation to a law enforcement officer of a record of a Canadian domestic violence protection order that identifies both a protected individual and a respondent and on
 its face is in effect constitutes probable cause to believe that a valid order exists.

(c) If a record of a Canadian domestic violence protection order is not presented as provided in subdivision (b), a law enforcement officer may consider other information in determining whether there is probable cause to believe that a valid Canadian domestic violence protection order exists.

(d) If a law enforcement officer determines that an otherwise valid Canadian domestic violence protection order cannot be enforced because the respondent has not been notified of or served with the order, the officer shall notify the protected individual that the officer will make reasonable efforts to contact the respondent, consistent with the safety of the protected individual. After notice to the protected
 individual and consistent with the safety of the individual, the officer shall make a reasonable effort to inform the respondent of the order, notify the respondent of the terms of the
 order, provide a record of the order, if available, to the respondent, and allow the respondent a reasonable opportunity to comply with the order before the officer enforces the order. Verbal notice of the terms of the order is sufficient for purposes of this subdivision.

(e) If a law enforcement officer determines that an individual is a protected individual, the officer shall inform the individual of available local victim services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 98, Sec. 1.   (SB 204)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6453.

(a) A tribunal of this state may issue an order enforcing or refusing to enforce a Canadian domestic violence protection order on application of any of the following:

(1) A protected party or other person authorized by law of this state other than this part to seek enforcement of a domestic protection order.

(2) A respondent.

(b) In a proceeding under subdivision (a), the tribunal of this state shall follow the procedures of this state for enforcement of a domestic protection order. An order entered under this section is limited to the
 enforcement of the terms of the Canadian domestic violence protection order as described in subdivision (a) of Section 6451.

(c) A Canadian domestic violence protection order is enforceable under this section if all of the following apply:

(1) The order identifies a protected individual and a respondent.

(2) The order is valid and in effect.

(3) The issuing court had jurisdiction over the parties and the subject matter under law applicable in the issuing court.

(4) The order was issued after either of the following:

(A) The respondent was given
 reasonable notice and had an opportunity to be heard before the court issued the order.

(B) In the case of an ex parte order, the respondent was given reasonable notice and had or will have an opportunity to be heard within a reasonable time after the order was issued, in a manner consistent with the right of the respondent to due process.

(d) A Canadian domestic violence protection order valid on its face is prima facie evidence of its enforceability under this section.

(e) A claim that a Canadian domestic violence protection order does not comply with subdivision (c) is an affirmative defense in a proceeding seeking enforcement of the order. If the tribunal of this state determines that the order is not enforceable, the tribunal
 of this state shall issue an order that the Canadian domestic violence protection order is not enforceable under this section and Section 6452 and may not be registered under Section 6454.

(f) This section applies to enforcement of a provision of a Canadian domestic violence protection order against a party to the order in which each party is a protected individual and respondent only if both of the following apply:

(1) The party seeking enforcement of the order filed a pleading requesting the order from the issuing court.

(2) The court made detailed findings of fact indicating that both parties acted as a primary aggressor and that neither party acted primarily in
 self-defense.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 98, Sec. 1.   (SB 204)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6454.

(a) An individual may register a Canadian domestic violence protection order in this state. To register the order, the individual must present a certified copy of the order to a court of this state to be entered into the California Restraining and Protective Order System established under Section 6380, pursuant to procedures set forth in Section 6404.

(b) A fee shall not be charged for the registration of a Canadian domestic violence protection order under this section.

(c) Registration in this state or filing under law of this state other than this part of a Canadian domestic violence protection order is not required for its
 enforcement under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 73.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6455.

(a) There shall be no civil liability on the part of, and no cause of action for false arrest or false imprisonment against, a law enforcement officer who makes an arrest pursuant to a Canadian domestic violence protection order that is regular upon its face, if the law enforcement officer, in making the arrest, acts in good faith and has reasonable cause to believe that the person against whom the order is issued has notice of the order and has committed an act in violation of the order.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to exonerate a law enforcement officer from liability for the unreasonable use of force in the enforcement of the order. The immunities
 afforded by this section shall not affect the availability of any other immunity that may apply, including, but not limited to, Sections 820.2 and 820.4 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 98, Sec. 1.   (SB 204)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6456.

An individual who seeks a remedy under this part may seek other legal or equitable remedies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 98, Sec. 1.   (SB 204)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6457.

If there is more than one order issued and one of the orders is an emergency protective order that has precedence in enforcement pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 136.2 of the Penal Code, the law enforcement officer shall enforce the emergency protective order. If there is more than one order issued, none of the orders issued is an emergency protective order that has precedence in enforcement, and one of the orders issued is a no-contact order, as described in Section 6320, the law enforcement officer shall enforce the no-contact order. If there is more than one civil order regarding the same parties and neither an emergency protective order that has precedence in enforcement nor a no-contact order has been issued, the law
 enforcement officer shall enforce the order that was issued last. If there are both civil and criminal orders regarding the same parties and neither an emergency protective order that has precedence in enforcement nor a no-contact order has been issued, the law enforcement officer shall enforce the criminal order issued last.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 98, Sec. 1.   (SB 204)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6458.

This part modifies, limits, or supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c)), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 98, Sec. 1.   (SB 204)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6459.

This part applies to a Canadian domestic violence protection order issued before, on, or after January 1, 2018, and to a continuing action for enforcement of a Canadian domestic violence protection order commenced before, on, or after January 1, 2018. A request for enforcement of a Canadian domestic violence protection order made on or after January 1, 2018, for a violation of the order occurring before, on, or after January 1, 2018, is governed by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 98, Sec. 1.   (SB 204)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6460.

If any provision of this part or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this part that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this part are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 98, Sec. 1.   (SB 204)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 11. MINORS [6500. - 7143.]



PART 1. AGE OF MAJORITY [6500. - 6502.]

6500.

A minor is an individual who is under 18 years of age. The period of minority is calculated from the first minute of the day on which the individual is born to the same minute of the corresponding day completing the period of minority.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6501.

An adult is an individual who is 18 years of age or older.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6502.

(a) The use of or reference to the words “age of majority,” “age of minority,” “adult,” “minor,” or words of similar intent in any instrument, order, transfer, or governmental communication made in this state:

(1) Before March 4, 1972, makes reference to individuals 21 years of age and older, or younger than 21 years of age.

(2) On or after March 4, 1972, makes reference to individuals 18 years of age and older, or younger than 18 years of age.

(b) Nothing in subdivision (a) or in Chapter 1748 of the Statutes of 1971 prevents amendment of any court order, will, trust, contract, transfer, or instrument to refer to the 18-year-old age of majority if the court order, will, trust, contract, transfer, or instrument satisfies all of the following conditions:

(1) It was in existence on March 4, 1972.

(2) It is subject to amendment by
 law, and amendment is allowable or not prohibited by its terms.

(3) It is otherwise subject to the laws of this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 1.5. CAREGIVERS [6550. - 6552.]

6550.

(a) A caregiver’s authorization affidavit that meets the requirements of this part authorizes a caregiver 18 years of age or older who completes items 1 to 4, inclusive, of the affidavit provided in Section 6552 and signs the affidavit to enroll a minor in school and consent to school-related medical care on behalf of the minor. A caregiver who is a relative and who completes items 1 to 8, inclusive, of the affidavit provided in Section 6552 and signs the affidavit shall have the same rights to authorize medical care and dental care for the minor that are given to guardians under Section 2353 of the Probate Code. The medical care authorized by this caregiver who is a relative may include mental health treatment subject to the limitations of Section 2356 of the Probate Code.

(b) The decision of a caregiver to consent to or to refuse medical or dental care for a minor shall be superseded by any contravening decision of the parent or other person having legal custody of the minor, provided the decision of the parent or other person having legal custody of the minor does not jeopardize the life, health, or safety of the minor.

(c) A person who acts in good faith reliance on a caregiver’s authorization affidavit to provide medical or dental care, without actual knowledge of facts contrary to those stated on the affidavit, is not subject to criminal liability or to civil liability to any person, and is not subject to professional disciplinary action, for that reliance if the applicable portions of the affidavit are completed. This subdivision applies even if medical or dental care is provided to a minor in contravention of the wishes of the parent or other
 person having legal custody of the minor as long as the person providing the medical or dental care has no actual knowledge of the wishes of the parent or other person having legal custody of the minor.

(d) A person who relies on the affidavit has no obligation to make any further inquiry or investigation.

(e) Nothing in this section relieves any individual from liability for violations of other provisions of law.

(f) If the minor stops living with the caregiver, the caregiver shall notify any school, health care provider, or health care service plan that has been given the affidavit. The affidavit is invalid after the school, health care provider, or health care service plan receives notice that the minor is no longer living with the caregiver.

(g) A
 caregiver’s authorization affidavit shall be invalid, unless it substantially contains, in not less than 10-point boldface type or a reasonable equivalent thereof, the warning statements specified in Section 6552. The warning statements shall be enclosed in a box with 3-point type rule lines.

(h) For purposes of this part, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Person” includes an individual, corporation, partnership, association, the state, or any city, county, city and county, or other public entity or governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal entity.

(2) “Relative” means an adult who is related to the child by blood, adoption, or affinity within the fifth degree of kinship, including all stepparents, stepsiblings, and all relatives whose status is preceded by the words “great,”
 “great-great,” or “grand,” or the spouse of any of the persons specified in this definition, even after the marriage has been terminated by death or dissolution.

(3) “School-related medical care” means medical care, including immunizations, physical examinations, and medical examinations conducted in schools for pupils, that is required by state or local governmental authority as a condition for school enrollment or participation in local educational agency-related extracurricular activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 664, Sec. 4.   (AB 495)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6552.

The caregiver’s authorization affidavit shall be in substantially the following form: Caregiver’s Authorization AffidavitUse of this affidavit is authorized by Part 1.5 (commencing with
 Section 6550) of Division 11 of the California Family Code.Instructions: Completion of items 1–4 and the signing of the affidavit is sufficient to authorize enrollment of a minor in school and authorize school-related medical care. Completion of items 5–8 is additionally required to authorize any other medical
 care. Print clearly.The minor named below lives in my home and I am 18 years of age or older.1.Name of minor:.2.Minor’s birth date:.3.My name (adult giving authorization):.4.My home address: .5. I am a relative of the child (see back of this form for a definition of “relative”).6.Check one or both (for example, if one parent was advised and the other cannot be located):◻I have advised the parent(s) or other person(s) having legal custody of the minor of my intent to authorize medical care, and have received no objection.◻I am unable to contact the parent(s) or other person(s) having legal custody of the minor at this time, to notify them of my intended authorization.7.My date of birth:.8.My California driver’s license or identification card or government-issued consular card number:.Warning to Caregiver: Do not sign this form if any of the statements above are incorrect, or you will be committing a crime punishable by a fine, imprisonment, or both.Warning to Local Educational Agencies and Health Care Service Providers: A seal or signature from a court is not required. This form is not required to be
 notarized.I declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State
 of California that the foregoing is true and correct.Dated: Signed: 
Notices:

1.This declaration does not affect the
 rights of the minor’s parents or legal guardian regarding the care, custody, and control of the minor, and does not mean that the caregiver has legal custody of the minor.

2.A person who relies on this affidavit has no obligation to make any further inquiry or investigation.

Additional Information:

TO CAREGIVERS:

1.“Relative,” for purposes of item 5, means an adult who is related to the child by blood, adoption, or affinity within the fifth degree of kinship, including stepparents, stepsiblings, and all relatives whose status is preceded by the words “great,” “great-great,” or “grand,” or the spouse of any of these persons even if the marriage was terminated by death or dissolution.

2.The law may require you,
 if you are not a relative, or a currently licensed, certified, or approved foster parent, to obtain resource family approval pursuant to Section 1517 of the Health and Safety Code or Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code in order to care for a minor. If you have any questions, please contact your local department of social services.

3.If the minor stops living with you, the affidavit is no longer valid. You are required to notify any school, health care provider, or health care service plan to which you have given this affidavit that the minor is no longer living with you and that, as a result, the affidavit is no longer valid.

4.If you do not have the information requested in item 8 (California driver’s license or I.D., or government-issued consular card), provide another form of identification such as your social security number or Medi-Cal number.

TO SCHOOL OFFICIALS:

1.Section 48204 of the Education Code provides that this affidavit constitutes a sufficient basis for a determination of residency of the minor, without the requirement of a guardianship or other custody order, unless the school district determines from actual facts that the minor is not living with the caregiver.

2.The school district may require additional reasonable evidence that the caregiver lives at the address provided in item 4.

3. A seal or signature of the court is not required. This form is not required to be notarized.

TO HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS AND HEALTH CARE SERVICE PLANS:

1.When signed by a relative,
 this affidavit shall confer the same rights to authorize medical care and dental care for the minor that are given to guardians under Section 2353 of the Probate Code. The medical care authorized by a relative caregiver may include mental health treatment subject to the limitations of Section 2356 of the Probate Code.

2.A health care service provider who acts in good faith reliance upon a caregiver’s authorization affidavit to provide medical or dental care, without actual knowledge of facts contrary to those stated on the affidavit, is not subject to criminal liability or to civil liability to any person, and is not subject to professional disciplinary action, for that reliance if the applicable portions of the form are completed. A seal or signature of the court is not required. This form is not required to be notarized.

3.This affidavit does not confer dependency for health care coverage
 purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 664, Sec. 5.   (AB 495)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. RIGHTS AND LIABILITIES; CIVIL ACTIONS AND PROCEEDINGS [6600. - 6602.]

6600.

A minor is civilly liable for a wrong done by the minor, but is not liable in exemplary damages unless at the time of the act the minor was capable of knowing that the act was wrongful.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6601.

A minor may enforce the minor’s rights by civil action or other legal proceedings in the same manner as an adult, except that a guardian must conduct the action or proceedings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6602.

A contract for attorney’s fees for services in litigation, made by or on behalf of a minor, is void unless the contract is approved, on petition by an interested person, by the court in which the litigation is pending or by the court having jurisdiction of the guardianship estate of the minor. If the contract is not approved and a judgment is recovered by or on behalf of the minor, the attorney’s fees chargeable against the minor shall be fixed by the court rendering the judgment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.5. ONLINE PLATFORMS [6650. - 6656.]

6650.

For the purposes of this part, all of the following definitions apply:

(a) “Age of majority” means 18 years of age or older.

(b) “Content” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 22675 of the Business and Professions Code. 

(c) “Family” means a group of persons related by blood or marriage, including civil partnerships, or whose close relationship with each other is considered equivalent to a family relationship by the individuals.

(d) “Minor” means an individual who is under 18 years of age.

(e) “Online platform” means any public-facing internet website, web application, or digital application, including a mobile application. “Online platform” includes a social media platform, as defined in Section 22675 of the Business and Professions Code, advertising network, mobile operating system, search engine, email service, or internet access service.

(f) “Reporting period” means a given month for which a parent, legal guardian, or family must set aside compensation for a minor pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 6651. 

(g) “Vlog” means content shared on an online platform in exchange for compensation.

(h) “Vlogger” means a parent, legal guardian, or family residing in California that creates image or video content that is performed in California in exchange for compensation. “Vlogger” does not
 include any person under 18 years of age who produces their own content.

(i) “Vlogging” means the act of sharing content on an online platform in exchange for compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 611, Sec. 1.   (SB 764)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6651.

A minor is considered engaged in the work of vlogging when the following are met at any time during a given month:

(a) (1) At least 30 percent of the vlogger’s compensated video content or the vlogger’s compensated image content includes the likeness, name, or photograph of the minor.

(2) The percentage pursuant to paragraph (1) is measured by the amount of time the likeness, name, or photograph of the minor visually appears or is the subject of an oral narrative in a video segment, as compared to the total length of the segment.

(b) The number of views received per image or video segment on any online platform met
 the online platform’s threshold for compensation or the vlogger received actual compensation for image or video content equal to or greater than ten cents ($0.10) per view.

(c) The vlogger received actual compensation for image or video content of at least one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250) in the month.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 611, Sec. 1.   (SB 764)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6652.

All vloggers whose content features a minor engaged in the work of vlogging, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 6651, shall maintain, and make available to the minor upon request, all of the following records:

(a) Documentary proof of the minor’s age when they started vlogging, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 6651.

(b) The number of vlogs that generated compensation, as described in Section 6651 during each reporting period.

(c) The total number of minutes of the vlogs that the vlogger received compensation for during each reporting period.

(d) The total
 number of minutes each minor was included in, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 6651, vlogs during each reporting period.

(e) The total compensation generated from vlogs featuring the minor during the reporting period.

(f) The amount deposited for the reporting period into the trust account for the benefit of the minor engaged in vlogging pursuant to Section 6653. This amount shall be calculated by multiplying the percentage of total minutes in subdivision (c) in which the minor is featured in subdivision (d) by the total compensation in subdivision (e) multiplied by .65.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 611, Sec. 1.   (SB 764)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6653.

(a) A minor satisfying the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 6651 shall be compensated by the vlogger, pursuant to the terms of this section. The vlogger shall set aside gross earnings on the image or video content meeting the requirements of Section 6651 in a trust account to be preserved for the benefit of the minor upon reaching the age of majority according to the following distribution:

(1) When only one minor meets the content threshold described in Section 6651, the minor shall receive a percentage of total gross earnings on any image or video segment, meeting the requirements of Section 6651, that is in proportion to the minor’s appearances in vlogging content during an applicable reporting period.

(2) When more than one minor meets the content threshold described in Section 6651 and an image or video segment includes more than one of those minors, the percentage described in paragraph (1) for all minors in any segment shall be equally divided between the minors, regardless of the differences in percentage of content provided by the individual minors. Each minor shall have their own trust account.

(b) (1) The vlogger shall establish the trust within 60 business days after the minor first meets the criteria in subdivision (a) of Section 6651. The vlogger shall establish a trust for each qualifying minor.

(2) The vlogger shall establish the trust in California either with a financial institution that is and remains insured at all times by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the
 Securities Investor Protection Corporation, or the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund or their respective successors, or with a company that is and remains registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940. The trustee or trustees of the trust shall be the only individual, individuals, entity, or entities with the obligation or duty to ensure that the funds remain in trust, in an account or other savings plan insured in accordance with this section, or with a company that is and remains registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940 as authorized by this section.

(3) The vlogger shall, within 10 business days of establishing the trust, prepare a written statement, under penalty of perjury, that shall include the name, address, and telephone number of the financial institution, the name of the account, the number of the account, the name of the minor beneficiary, the name of the trustee or trustees of the account, and any
 additional information needed by the vlogger to deposit into the account the portion of the minor’s gross earnings prescribed by subdivision (a). The trustee or trustees shall attach to the written statement a true and accurate photocopy of any information received from the financial institution confirming the creation of the account, such as an account agreement, account terms, passbook, or other similar writings.

(4) The funds in the account shall be available only to the beneficiary of the trust. The vlogger shall deposit the funds into the account no less than once every three months.

(5) Except as otherwise provided in this section, prior to the date on which the beneficiary of the trust attains the age of majority or the issuance of a declaration of emancipation of the minor pursuant to Section 7122, a withdrawal by the beneficiary or any other individual, individuals,
 entity, or entities shall not be made for the funds deposited in trust. Upon reaching the age of majority, the beneficiary may withdraw the funds on deposit in the trust only after providing a certified copy of the beneficiary’s birth certificate to the financial institution where the trust is located.

(c) Upon application by the trustee or trustees, the trust funds shall be handled by the financial institution or company in which the trust is held in one or more of the following methods:

(1) The financial institution or company may transfer funds to another account or other savings plan at the same financial institution or company, provided that the funds transferred shall continue to be held in trust, and subject to this part.

(2) The financial institution or company may transfer funds to another financial